Maryland, session 2025, HB0148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
27–501.
(k) With respect to private passenger motor vehicle insurance, an insurer may not
cancel or refuse to renew coverage OR INCREASE THE PREMIUM OF THE PRIVATE
PASSENGER MOTOR VEHICLE INSURANCE POLICY based on the claims history of an
insured where two or fewer of the claims within the preceding 3–year period were for
accidents or losses where the insured was not at fault for the loss.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0148*